New York, session 2025-2026, A9601.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The labor law is amended by adding a new section 211-b to 2 read as follows: 3 § 211-b. Human review of resume screening and hiring decisions. 1. An 4 employer shall not use an automated system, including, but not limited 5 to, an automated employment decision tool, algorithm, artificial intel- 6 ligence system, or similar automated process to screen resumes or appli- 7 cants unless there is a meaningful human review of the output of such 8 automated system prior to making any final or adverse employment deci- 9 sion. 10 2. No applicant for employment may be denied employment solely on the 11 basis of an action by an automated system. Any recommendations, scores, 12 rankings, or filters made or applied by an automated system shall be 13 subject to human evaluation and override authority. 14 3. Any employer that uses an automated system in the hiring process 15 shall: 16 (a) notify applicants that an automated system will be used; 17 (b) describe, in plain language, the type of data analyzed; and 18 (c) describe the role of the human reviewer in the final employment 19 decision. 20 4. When an automated system is used in the process of making employ- 21 ment decisions, an applicant who received an adverse employment decision 22 shall be entitled to receive a human-conducted review of the employment 23 decision upon the request of such applicant. 24 5. The commissioner shall be authorized to enforce the provisions of 25 this section. Upon a finding that a violation of this section has EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14121-01-5 A. 9601 2 1 occurred, the commissioner may issue administrative fines and cease-and- 2 desist orders and may require corrective action for such violations. 3 6. Definitions. For purposes of this section: 4 (a) "Automated employment decision tool" means any computational, 5 algorithmic, artificial intelligence-based, or statistical system that 6 assists in screening, ranking, scoring, evaluating, recommending, 7 filtering or selecting applicants. 8 (b) "Meaningful human review" means a deliberate evaluation conducted 9 by a human with decision-making authority to modify or overturn the 10 outcome or employment decision of an automated system. 11 7. The commissioner is authorized to promulgate any rules and regu- 12 lations necessary to implement the provisions of this section. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.